District of Columbia statutes.
4-1341.05

Service of process.

The Trust Fund shall maintain a designated agent to accept service of process for the Trust Fund. Notice to or service upon the agent is notice or service upon the Trust Fund.

History

Nov. 20, 1993, D.C. Law 10-56, § 6, 40 DCR 7222

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-2135.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of subchapter, see notes to § 4-1341.01.